Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB75.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of providing citizens of the Commonwealth the
right to exempt their primary residence and their primary vehicle from property tax after
the year 2028 by amending the Constitution of Kentucky to read as stated below?
Section 2. It is proposed that Section 1 of the Constitution of Kentucky be
amended to read as follows:
All men are, by nature, free and equal, and have certain inherent and inalienable
rights, among which may be reckoned:
First: The right of enjoying and defending their lives and liberties.
Second: The right of worshipping Almighty God according to the dictates of their
consciences.
Third: The right of seeking and pursuing their safety and happiness.
Fourth: The right of freely communicating their thoughts and opinions.
Fifth: The right of acquiring and protecting property.
Sixth: The right of assembling together in a peaceable manner for their common
good, and of applying to those invested with the power of government for redress of
grievances or other proper purposes, by petition, address or remonstrance.
Seventh: The right to bear arms in defense of themselves and of the State, subject to
the power of the General Assembly to enact laws to prevent persons from carrying
concealed weapons.
Eighth: The right of exempting from property tax a property owned and
maintained solely as their primary residence and a motor vehicle owned and
maintained solely as their primary vehicle after calendar year 2028.
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:41 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1435
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 4 and 5
of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State shall cause the question in Section 1 of this Act and the entirety of the
proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section 2 of this Act
to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation published in this
state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the same manner the
fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their acceptance or rejection at
the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be voted for.
The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415 shall be made no later than the
first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, not
later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August preceding the next
regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be chosen in a year in
which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the United States, or not
later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September preceding a regular election
in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice President of the United
States, the Secretary of State shall certify the complete text of Section 1 of this Act and
the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in
Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk shall have
the entirety of the text and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on the ballots
provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting machines in
use in each county or precinct.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/6/2026 8:41 AM Jacketed